Nebraska, session 109, LB961.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB961 LB961
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 14 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Collateral Sanction Relief Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Collateral Sanction Relief Act:
(1) Certificate of qualification for employment means a certificate
issued under the Collateral Sanction Relief Act;
(2)(a) Collateral sanction means a penalty, disability, or
disadvantage that relates to employment or occupational regulation, that
arises as a result of a conviction, and that applies because of a
statute, rule, or regulation.
(b) Collateral sanction does not include imprisonment, probation,
parole, post-release supervision, forfeiture, restitution, or assessment
of a fine or court costs;
(3) Completion of a sentence means completion of any and all periods
of imprisonment, probation, parole, and post-release supervision;
satisfaction of any fine, court costs, and restitution; and satisfaction
of any other aspect of a sentence for an offense;
(4) Conviction or convicted includes a plea or verdict of guilty or
a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere and includes a
conviction of any felony or misdemeanor;
(5) Decisionmaker includes, but is not limited to, any occupational
board, department, state agency, board, commission, or instrumentality
established by the law of this state for the exercise of any function of
government; political subdivision; public educational institution; or
contractor or subcontractor made subject to the act by contract, law, or
ordinance;
(6) Discretionary collateral sanction means a collateral sanction
imposed by statute, rule, or regulation that permits:
(a) Any occupational board or other decisionmaker to deny an
application for a government certification, a registration, or an
occupational license due to a conviction or to revoke such certification,
registration, or license due to a conviction; or
-2-

LB961 LB961
2026 2026
(b) An employer to refuse to employ an individual due to a
conviction;
(7) Government certification has the same meaning as in section
84-935;
(8) Mandatory collateral sanction means a collateral sanction
imposed by statute, rule, or regulation that:
(a) Requires an occupational board or other entity to deny an
application for a government certification, a registration, or an
occupational license due to a conviction or to revoke such certification,
registration, or license due to a conviction; or
(b) Precludes an employer from employing an individual due to a
conviction;
(9) Occupational board has the same meaning as in section 84-938;
(10) Occupational regulation has the same meaning as in section
84-940;
(11) Offense means any felony or misdemeanor under the laws of this
state; and
(12) Registration has the same meaning as in section 84-944.
Sec. 3. (1) An individual who is subject to a collateral sanction
as a result of a conviction may file a petition for a certificate of
qualification for employment as provided in this section.
(2) The petition shall be filed in a form and manner prescribed by
the State Court Administrator. The petition shall be filed in the county
court or district court in which the conviction was entered. There shall
be no fee charged for filing such petition.
(3) The petition shall contain the following information:
(a) The petitioner's name, date of birth, and social security
number;
(b) All aliases of the petitioner and all social security numbers
associated with those aliases;
(c) The petitioner's residence address, including the city, county,
-3-

LB961 LB961
2026 2026
and state of residence and zip code;
(d) The length of time that the petitioner has resided in the
petitioner's current state of residence, expressed in years and months of
residence;
(e) A general statement as to why the petitioner has filed the
petition and how the certificate would assist the petitioner;
(f) A summary of the petitioner's employment history, specifying the
name of, and dates of employment with, each employer;
(g) Verifiable references and endorsements;
(h) The name of one or more immediate family members of the
petitioner, or other persons with whom the petitioner has a close
relationship, who support the petition;
(i) A summary of the reason the petitioner believes the certificate
should be granted; and
(j) Any other information prescribed by the State Court
Administrator.
Sec. 4. An individual may file a petition under section 3 of this
act upon completion of sentence. A petition may be filed prior to
completion of sentence if the petitioner attaches to the petition a
letter in support of the petition from his or her probation officer or
parole officer.
Sec. 5. (1)(a) Upon receipt of a petition under section 3 of this
act, the court shall review the petition to determine if it is complete.
(b) If the petition is not complete, the court shall notify the
petitioner. The petitioner may submit a completed petition within
fourteen days after the notification. If the petitioner does not submit a
completed petition within such deadline, the petition shall be dismissed
without prejudice.
(c) If the petition is complete, the court shall proceed as provided
in subsections (2) through (4) of this section.
(2) Upon receipt of a complete petition, the court shall:
-4-

LB961 LB961
2026 2026
(a) Determine whether the petitioner has been convicted of an
offense by any other court in this state;
(b) Notify any court identified under subdivision (2)(a) of this
section that such court may submit comments regarding the petition;
(c) Notify the county attorney; and
(d) Notify any known victims of the offense or offenses underlying
the petition.
(3) The county attorney, any victim of an offense of the petitioner,
and any court notified under subdivision (2)(a) of this section may
submit materials in support of or opposition to the petition. Any such
materials shall be submitted no later than thirty days after the date of
filing of a complete petition. Such period may be extended upon request
by the petitioner for good cause shown.
(4) Following expiration of the period in subsection (3) of this
section, the court may grant a petition without a hearing but shall not
deny a petition without giving the petitioner notice and an opportunity
for a hearing. Such hearing shall be scheduled for no later than thirty
days after expiration of the period described in subsection (3) of this
section. If a hearing is scheduled, the county attorney and each victim
notified under subsection (2) of this section shall be given notice of
the hearing. The petitioner, county attorney, and any victim of the
petitioner may appear and present evidence regarding the petition.
Sec. 6. (1) A court shall only grant a petition if the court finds
that the petitioner has not been convicted of an offense or charged with
an offense during the following periods:
(a) If the individual has already received a set aside under section
29-2264 or is filing the petition for a certificate of qualification at
the same time as a petition for a set aside, the period of six months
preceding the date the petition would be granted; or
(b) If subdivision (1)(a) of this section does not apply:
(i) The period of three years preceding the date the petition would
-5-

LB961 LB961
2026 2026
be granted for a conviction involving one or more felonies; or
(ii) The period of two years preceding the date the petition would
be granted for a conviction involving one or more misdemeanors and no
felonies.
(2) In addition to the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section, the court may grant a petition if the court finds, by a
preponderance of the evidence, that granting the petition:
(a) Will materially assist the petitioner in obtaining employment,
housing, or a government certification, a registration, or an
occupational license; and
(b) Would not pose an unreasonable risk to the safety of the public
or any individual.
(3) In deciding whether to grant or deny a petition, the court shall
consider:
(a) The petition;
(b) Any materials submitted or evidence received at a hearing under
section 5 of this act;
(c) Any presentence investigation report regarding the petitioner;
(d) The petitioner's criminal history and rehabilitation efforts,
including completion of educational or vocational programs, community
involvement, and compliance with probation, parole, or other supervision;
(e) The age and circumstances of the petitioner at the time of the
offense;
(f) Evidence of lawful behavior since completion of sentence; and
(g) The petitioner's employment history and prospects.
(4) The court may order a presentence investigation report to be
prepared or updated to assist in determining whether to grant or deny a
petition.
(5) The Department of Correctional Services and the Board of Parole
shall cooperate with courts, the State Court Administrator, and the
Office of Probation Administration in carrying out the Collateral
-6-

LB961 LB961
2026 2026
Sanction Relief Act. The department and the board shall provide courts or
the office with any information regarding a petitioner that is relevant
to a petition and requested by a court or the office.
(6) The court shall issue a written decision granting or denying the
petition within thirty days after a hearing under section 5 of this act
or, if no hearing was held, within thirty days after expiration of the
period described in subsection (3) of section 5 of this act.
Sec. 7. (1) There is a rebuttable presumption that a petition for a
certificate of qualification or employment shall be granted if:
(a) The conviction does not involve any Class I, IA, IB, IC, ID, or
II felony; and
(b) The petitioner has not been convicted of an offense or charged
with an offense during the following periods:
(i) If the individual has already received a set aside under section
29-2264 or the court will grant a petition for a set aside at the same
proceeding, the period of one year preceding the date the petition would
be granted; or
(ii) If subdivision (1)(b)(i) of this section does not apply:
(A) The period of five years preceding the date the petition would
be granted for a conviction involving one or more felonies; or
(B) The period of three years preceding the date the petition would
be granted for a conviction involving one or more misdemeanors and no
felonies.
(2) A petition that satisfies subsection (1) of this section shall
be denied only if:
(a) The court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the
petitioner has not been rehabilitated or that granting the petition would
pose an unreasonable risk to the safety of the public or any individual;
or
(b) If the petition is a subsequent petition, it does not satisfy
any condition set for a subsequent petition under section 8 of this act.
-7-

LB961 LB961
2026 2026
Sec. 8. (1) If a court denies a petition, the court shall set forth
its decision in writing. As part of a denial, the court may place
conditions on the petitioner regarding the filing of a subsequent
petition relating to the same conviction.
(2) If a court grants a petition, the court shall issue the
petitioner a certificate of qualification for employment. The certificate
shall be in a form prescribed by the State Court Administrator.
(3) An order granting or denying a petition is a final, appealable
order for purposes of section 25-1902.
Sec. 9. (1) A certificate of qualification for employment lifts the
automatic bar of a collateral sanction, and a decisionmaker shall
determine on a case-by-case basis whether to grant or deny the issuance
or restoration of any government certification, registration, or
occupational license or whether to hire an individual for employment. In
making such determination, the decisionmaker shall not reconsider or
reject any finding made by the court in granting the petition.
(2) The certificate constitutes a rebuttable presumption that any
criminal conviction that is the subject of the certificate is not
sufficient evidence that the individual is unfit for employment or any
government certification, registration, or occupational license. This
presumption may be rebutted if the decisionmaker determines, on an
individualized basis, that the individual is unfit.
(3) For an individual with a certificate, a decisionmaker shall
treat a mandatory collateral sanction as a discretionary collateral
sanction.
Sec. 10. (1) In a judicial or administrative proceeding alleging
negligence or other fault, a certificate of qualification for employment
may be introduced as evidence of a person's due care in any of the
following if the person knew of such certificate at the time of the
alleged negligence or other fault:
(a) Granting or restoring a government certification, a
-8-

LB961 LB961
2026 2026
registration, or an occupational license to the individual holding the
certificate; or
(b) Hiring, retaining, leasing to, admitting to a school or program,
or otherwise transacting business or engaging in activity with such
individual.
(2) In any civil action against an employer for negligent hiring of
the individual holding a certificate of qualification for employment,
such certificate shall provide immunity for the employer as to the
negligent hiring claim if the employer knew of the certificate at the
time of the alleged negligence.
(3) In a civil action against an employer alleging negligence in
retaining the employment of an individual holding a certificate of
qualification for employment who, subsequent to being hired, demonstrates
dangerousness or is convicted of a felony, the employer shall be immune
as to such negligent retention claim unless it is proved by a
preponderance of the evidence that:
(a) The person with responsibility for retaining such individual or
terminating such individual's employment had actual knowledge of such
demonstration of dangerousness or conviction; and
(b) Such person willfully retained or failed to terminate the
employment of such individual.
Sec. 11. (1) A certificate of qualification for employment shall be
revoked if the individual holding the certificate is convicted of a
felony. The certificate shall only be revoked upon such conviction
becoming final.
(2) The Office of Probation Administration shall periodically review
the certificates listed in the database described in section 12 of this
act to identify certificates that are subject to revocation under this
section. Upon identifying a certificate of qualification for employment
that is subject to revocation, the office shall note in the database that
the certificate has been revoked, the reason for revocation, and the
-9-

LB961 LB961
2026 2026
effective date of revocation. The office shall notify the individual that
such certificate has been revoked. Notification shall be given in a form
and manner prescribed by the office.
Sec. 12. The Office of Probation Administration shall maintain a
database to track certificates of qualification for employment that have
been granted and revoked. Such database shall also track information
regarding the industries, occupations, and professions for which
certificates are used. The office shall annually create a report that
summarizes the information maintained in the database and shall publish
such report on its public Internet website no later than December 31 of
each year.
Sec. 13. A certificate of qualification for employment shall not:
(1) Preclude use of the conviction as evidence of commission of the
offense for purposes of determining whether an application filed or a
license issued under sections 71-1901 to 71-1906.01, the Child Care
Licensing Act, or the Children's Residential Facilities and Placing
Licensure Act, or a certificate issued under sections 79-806 to 79-815
should be denied, suspended, or revoked;
(2) Preclude use of the conviction as evidence of serious misconduct
or final conviction of or pleading guilty or nolo contendere to a felony
or misdemeanor for purposes of determining whether an application filed
or a certificate issued under sections 81-1401 to 81-1414.19 should be
denied, suspended, or revoked;
(3) Relieve a person who is convicted of an offense for which
registration is required under the Sex Offender Registration Act of the
duty to register and to comply with the terms of such act;
(4) Preclude use of the conviction for purposes of section 28-1206;
(5) Affect the right of a victim of a crime to prosecute or defend a
civil action;
(6) Affect the assessment or accumulation of points under section
60-4,182; or
-10-

LB961 LB961
2026 2026
(7) Affect eligibility for, or obligations relating to, a commercial
driver's license as defined in section 60-464.
Sec. 14. The State Court Administrator and the Office of Probation
Administration may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry
out the Collateral Sanction Relief Act.
Sec. 15. Section 29-2264, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-2264 (1) Whenever any person is placed on probation by a court
and satisfactorily completes the conditions of his or her probation for
the entire period or is discharged from probation prior to the
termination of the period of probation, the sentencing court shall issue
an order releasing the offender from probation. Such order in all felony
cases shall provide notice that the person's voting rights are restored
upon completion of probation. The order shall include information on
restoring other civil rights through the pardon process, including
application to and hearing by the Board of Pardons.
(2) Whenever any person is convicted of an offense and is placed on
probation by the court, is sentenced to a fine only, or is sentenced to
community service, he or she may, after satisfactory fulfillment of the
conditions of probation for the entire period or after discharge from
probation prior to the termination of the period of probation and after
payment of any fine and completion of any community service, petition the
sentencing court to set aside the conviction.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (3)(b) of this section,
whenever any person is convicted of an offense and is sentenced other
than as provided in subsection (2) of this section, but is not sentenced
to a term of imprisonment of more than one year, such person may, after
completion of his or her sentence, petition the sentencing court to set
aside the conviction.
(b) A petition under subdivision (3)(a) of this section shall be
denied if filed:
-11-

LB961 LB961
2026 2026
(i) By any person with a criminal charge pending in any court in the
United States or in any other country;
(ii) During any period in which the person is required to register
under the Sex Offender Registration Act;
(iii) For any misdemeanor or felony motor vehicle offense under
section 28-306 or the Nebraska Rules of the Road; or
(iv) Within two years after a denial of a petition to set aside a
conviction under this subsection.
(4) In determining whether to set aside the conviction, the court
shall consider:
(a) The behavior of the offender after sentencing;
(b) The likelihood that the offender will not engage in further
criminal activity; and
(c) The petitioner's criminal history and rehabilitation efforts,
including completion of educational or vocational programs, community
involvement, and compliance with probation, parole, or other supervision;
(d) The age and circumstances of the petitioner at the time of the
offense;
(e) Evidence of lawful behavior since completion of the petitioner's
sentence;
(f) The petitioner's employment history and prospects; and
(g) (c) Any other information the court considers relevant.
(5)(a) There is a rebuttable presumption that a petition for a set
aside shall be granted if:
(i) The conviction does not involve any Class I, IA, IB, IC, ID, or
II felony; and
(ii) The petitioner has not been convicted of an offense or charged
with an offense during the following periods:
(A) The period of five years preceding the date the petition would
be granted for a conviction involving one or more felonies; or
(B) The period of three years preceding the date the petition would
-12-

LB961 LB961
2026 2026
be granted for a conviction involving one or more misdemeanors and no
felonies.
(b) A petition that satisfies subdivision (5)(a) of this section
shall be denied only if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence
that the petitioner has not been rehabilitated or that granting the
petition would pose an unreasonable risk to the safety of the public or
any individual.
(6) (5) The court may grant the offender's petition and issue an
order setting aside the conviction when in the opinion of the court the
order will be in the best interest of the offender and consistent with
the public welfare. The order shall:
(a) Nullify the conviction;
(b) Remove all civil disabilities and disqualifications imposed as a
result of the conviction; and
(c) Notify the offender that he or she should consult with an
attorney regarding the effect of the order, if any, on the offender's
ability to possess a firearm under state or federal law.
(7) (6) The setting aside of a conviction in accordance with the
Nebraska Probation Administration Act shall not:
(a) Require the reinstatement of any office, employment, or position
which was previously held and lost or forfeited as a result of the
conviction;
(b) Preclude proof of a plea of guilty whenever such plea is
relevant to the determination of an issue involving the rights or
liabilities of someone other than the offender;
(c) Preclude proof of the conviction as evidence of the commission
of the offense whenever the fact of its commission is relevant for the
purpose of impeaching the offender as a witness, except that the order
setting aside the conviction may be introduced in evidence;
(d) Preclude use of the conviction for the purpose of determining
sentence on any subsequent conviction of a criminal offense;
-13-

LB961 LB961
2026 2026
(e) Preclude the proof of the conviction as evidence of the
commission of the offense in the event an offender is charged with a
subsequent offense and the penalty provided by law is increased if the
prior conviction is proved;
(f) Preclude the proof of the conviction to determine whether an
offender is eligible to have a subsequent conviction set aside in
accordance with the Nebraska Probation Administration Act;
(g) Preclude use of the conviction as evidence of commission of the
offense for purposes of determining whether an application filed or a
license issued under sections 71-1901 to 71-1906.01, the Child Care
Licensing Act, or the Children's Residential Facilities and Placing
Licensure Act or a certificate issued under sections 79-806 to 79-815
should be denied, suspended, or revoked;
(h) Preclude use of the conviction as evidence of serious misconduct
or final conviction of or pleading guilty or nolo contendere to a felony
or misdemeanor for purposes of determining whether an application filed
or a certificate issued under sections 81-1401 to 81-1414.19 should be
denied, suspended, or revoked;
(i) Preclude proof of the conviction as evidence whenever the fact
of the conviction is relevant to a determination of the registration
period under section 29-4005;
(j) Relieve a person who is convicted of an offense for which
registration is required under the Sex Offender Registration Act of the
duty to register and to comply with the terms of the act;
(k) Preclude use of the conviction for purposes of section 28-1206;
(l) Affect the right of a victim of a crime to prosecute or defend a
civil action;
(m) Affect the assessment or accumulation of points under section
60-4,182; or
(n) Affect eligibility for, or obligations relating to, a commercial
driver's license.
-14-

LB961 LB961
2026 2026
(8) (7) For purposes of this section, offense means any violation of
the criminal laws of this state or any political subdivision of this
state including, but not limited to, any felony, misdemeanor, infraction,
traffic infraction, violation of a city or village ordinance, or
violation of a county resolution.
(9) (8) Except as otherwise provided for the notice in subsection
(1) of this section, changes made to this section by Laws 2005, LB 713,
shall be retroactive in application and shall apply to all persons,
otherwise eligible in accordance with the provisions of this section,
whether convicted prior to, on, or subsequent to September 4, 2005.
(10) (9) The changes made to this section by Laws 2018, LB146, and
Laws 2020, LB881, and this legislative bill shall apply to all persons
otherwise eligible under this section, without regard to the date of the
conviction sought to be set aside.
Sec. 16. Section 29-3005, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-3005 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Prostitution-related offense includes:
(i) Prostitution under section 28-801, solicitation of prostitution
under section 28-801.01, keeping a place of prostitution under section
28-804, public indecency under section 28-806, or loitering for the
purpose of engaging in prostitution or related or similar offenses under
local ordinances; and
(ii) Attempt, conspiracy, solicitation, being an accessory to,
aiding and abetting, aiding the consummation of, or compounding a felony
with any of the offenses in subdivision (1)(a) of this section as the
underlying offense;
(b) Trafficker means a person who engages in sex trafficking or sex
trafficking of a minor as defined in section 28-830; and
(c) Victim of sex trafficking means a person subjected to sex
trafficking or sex trafficking of a minor, as those terms are defined in
-15-

LB961 LB961
2026 2026
section 28-830.
(2) At any time following the completion of sentence or disposition,
a victim of sex trafficking convicted in county or district court of, or
adjudicated in a juvenile court for, (a) a prostitution-related offense
committed while the movant was a victim of sex trafficking or proximately
caused by the movant's status as a victim of sex trafficking or (b) any
other offense committed as a direct result of, or proximately caused by,
the movant's status as a victim of sex trafficking, may file a motion to
set aside such conviction or adjudication. The motion shall be filed in
the county, district, or separate juvenile court of the county in which
the movant was convicted or adjudicated.
(3)(a) If the court finds that the movant was a victim of sex
trafficking at the time of the prostitution-related offense or finds that
the movant's participation in the prostitution-related offense was
proximately caused by the movant's status as a victim of sex trafficking,
the court shall grant the motion to set aside a conviction or an
adjudication for such prostitution-related offense.
(b) If the court finds that the movant's participation in an offense
other than a prostitution-related offense was a direct result of or
proximately caused by the movant's status as a victim of sex trafficking,
the court shall grant the motion to set aside a conviction or an
adjudication for such offense.
(4) Official documentation of a movant's status as a victim of sex
trafficking at the time of the prostitution-related offense or other
offense shall create a rebuttable presumption that the movant was a
victim of sex trafficking at the time of the prostitution-related offense
or other offense. Such official documentation shall not be required to
obtain relief under this section. Such official documentation includes:
(a) A copy of an official record, certification, or eligibility
letter from a federal, state, tribal, or local proceeding, including an
approval notice or an enforcement certification generated from a federal
-16-

LB961 LB961
2026 2026
immigration proceeding, that shows that the movant is a victim of sex
trafficking; or
(b) An affidavit or sworn testimony from an attorney, a member of
the clergy, a medical professional, a trained professional staff member
of a victim services organization, or other professional from whom the
movant has sought legal counsel or other assistance in addressing the
trauma associated with being a victim of sex trafficking.
(5) In considering whether the movant is a victim of sex
trafficking, the court may consider any other evidence the court
determines is of sufficient credibility and probative value, including an
affidavit or sworn testimony. Examples of such evidence include, but are
not limited to:
(a) Branding or other tattoos on the movant that identified him or
her as having a trafficker;
(b) Testimony or affidavits from those with firsthand knowledge of
the movant's involvement in the commercial sex trade such as solicitors
of commercial sex, family members, hotel workers, and other individuals
trafficked by the same individual or group of individuals who trafficked
the movant;
(c) Financial records showing profits from the commercial sex trade,
such as records of hotel stays, employment at indoor venues such as
massage parlors, bottle clubs, or strip clubs, or employment at an escort
service;
(d) Internet listings, print advertisements, or business cards used
to promote the movant for commercial sex; or
(e) Email, text, or voicemail records between the movant, the
trafficker, or solicitors of sex that reveal aspects of the sex trade
such as behavior patterns, meeting times, or payments or examples of the
trafficker exerting force, fraud, or coercion over the movant.
(6) Upon request of a movant, any hearing relating to the motion
shall be conducted in camera. The rules of evidence shall not apply at
-17-

LB961 LB961
2026 2026
any hearing relating to the motion.
(7) An order setting aside a conviction or an adjudication under
this section shall have the same effect as an order setting aside a
conviction as provided in subsections (6) (5) and (7) (6) of section
29-2264.
Sec. 17. Original sections 29-2264 and 29-3005, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-18-